Hawaii statutes.
[§98-7] Preservation and security of legal
material in official electronic record. (a) An official publisher of
legal material in an electronic record that is or was designated as official
under section 98-4 shall provide for the preservation and security of the
record in an electronic form or a form that is not electronic.

(b) If legal material is preserved under
subsection (a) in an electronic record, the official publisher shall:

(1) Ensure the integrity of the record;

(2) Provide for backup and disaster recovery of the
record; and

(3) Ensure the continuing usability of the material.
[L 2013, c 11, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next